Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2018
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means the ready availability of the supervising physician for consultation and collaboration on the activities of the physician assistant.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 676;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 41;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 9.